Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6012
Nursing home, defined.

Nursing home shall mean a nursing facility or a skilled nursing facility as defined in section 71-424 or 71-429.

Laws 1983, LB 235, § 5;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 122.